Tennessee, session 114, SB2194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 48-68-203(a), is amended by adding
the following language after the first sentence:
Such notice must be provided not less than thirty (30) days prior to the transaction.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2194
012388
- 1 -